South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The gross proceeds of sales or the sales price of new or used handguns, as defined pursuant to Section 16-23-10(1), rifles, shotguns, and ammunition, sold during the month of July 2025, are exempted from the taxes imposed by Chapter 36, Title 12 of the S.C. Code. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----